Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB560.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45.021 is amended to read as follows:
The Finance and Administration Cabinet, within budgetary limits fixed by any
appropriations made by the General Assembly for such purpose, shall contract with:
(1) The City of Frankfort for the provision by the city to state agencies located at the
seat of government for fire and police protection of state-owned property and other
municipal services as are provided by the city to commercial and industrial
taxpayers residing in the City of Frankfort; and
(2) Each local board of education of a school district where:
(a) Sixty-five percent (65%) or more of the total assessed value of real property
located within the district is exempt from property taxation; and
(b) Financial relief is not provided from other sources to reimburse the
property tax revenue lost from the tax-exempt properties;
to provide a payment for the local board of education's recoupment of at least
twenty-five percent (25%) of the total property tax revenue lost from the tax-
exempt properties each year.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:00 PM Jacketed